Hawaii statutes.
§206J-9 Construction contracts. The
development corporation shall award construction contracts in conformity with
chapter 103D and this chapter. [L 1981, c 236, pt of §1; ree L 1986, c 146, §6;
am L Sp 1993, c 8, §54]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next